Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-151
Wholesale rate restrictions.

A telecommunications company that obtains at wholesale rates basic local exchange service from another telecommunications company that is available at retail to a specific class of subscribers shall not offer such basic local exchange service to a different class of subscribers.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 50.